Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3634
Board; cooperate with University of Nebraska and other organizations.

The board shall not be authorized to set up research or development units or agencies of its own, but shall limit its activity to cooperation and contracts with the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources and other proper local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the Nebraska Corn Resources Act.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 34;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 17.